Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6728
Registration; renewal; fee.

Registration as a medication aide shall be renewed biennially based upon competency. The department may prescribe by rule and regulation how a medication aide can show competency for purposes of renewal. Payment of the applicable fee shall be a condition of renewal. After September 1, 2007, any registration that is renewed shall expire two years after the date the registration would have expired if it had not been renewed. A medication aide who provides medication aide services prior to registration or after the date the registration expires shall be subject to the civil penalty prescribed in section 38-198.

Laws 1998, LB 1354, § 18;

Laws 2007, LB283, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1289.